Utah statutes.
65A-8-202.   Fire control -- County responsibilities.
(1)  Counties shall abate the public nuisance caused by uncontrolled fire on
privately owned or county owned forest, range, and watershed lands.
(2)  Counties, or other political subdivisions of the state as determined to
be appropriate by the state forester, may participate in the wildland fire
protection system of the division and become eligible for assistance from the
state by agreement under the provisions of this chapter.
(3)  The state forester shall make certain that appropriate action is taken to
control wildland fires on nonfederal forest, range, and watershed lands.
(4)  The actual costs of suppression action taken by the division on privately
owned lands shall be a charge against the county in which the lands lie,
unless otherwise provided by cooperative agreement.
